Massachusetts, session 194th, H2751.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 8 of Chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting in subsection a, in line 19 after the words “twelve month period.”
the following:- Veterans authorized to retire pursuant to section 52, section 53, section 56,
section 57, and section 58 shall be exempt from evaluations following their first 5 years of
retirement for
of 1